Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-482
Certain wild animals; keeping in captivity; violations; penalty; officers; entry and inspection authorized.

Any person violating the provisions of sections 37-477 to 37-481 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Any conservation officer or other peace officer authorized to enforce the Game Law may, at any time, enter a facility associated with a captive wildlife auction permit or a captive wildlife permit for the purpose of inspecting the facility or enforcing the Game Law.

Laws 1957, c. 151, § 6, p. 491;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 204;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-718;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 192;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 61.